Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.170

Legal services revolving fund—Disbursements.

Disbursements from the legal services revolving fund shall be pursuant to vouchers executed by the attorney general or his or her designee in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.88.160.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5057; 1971 ex.s. c 71 s 3.]